Massachusetts, session 194th, H2162.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Section 27D of chapter 149 of the General Laws is hereby amended by 
inserting at the end thereof the following new paragraphs:- 
For the purposes of this section, the words “construction” and “constructed” shall include 
offsite fabrication work for any project covered by this section. In such cases, the wage required 
under this chapter shall be paid for such work and the requirements of Section 27B of chapter 
149 shall apply to such work, including, but not limited to, weekly submission of certified 
payroll records and an accompanying statement made under penalties of perjury. Penalties 
provided under Section 27C of chapter 149 shall apply to such work. 

of 2 9  The term “offsite fabrication” means products or items that are: (a) produced specifically 
for a qualified project; (b) considered to be non-standard items; and (c) produced at an offsite 
location, including, but not limited to those made or consisting of fabricated pipe, piping 
materials or fixtures, electrical wiring, sheet metal materials, or any systems, components or 
modular units made of any of the foregoing. Nothing in the foregoing definition of “offsite 
fabrication” is intended to restrict application of Section 26 of chapter 149 of the General Laws 
or to prevent the Commonwealth, or a county, town, authority or district thereof contracting for 
the construction of public works from giving preference to offsite fabrication performed at an 
offsite location within a specific geographical area. 
SECTION 2. Section 27B of chapter 149 of the General Laws is hereby amended by 
inserting at the end thereof the following new paragraph: 
For any offsite fabrication work subject to this section, the contractor, subcontractor or 
public body shall include a section in their weekly certified prevailing wage records that 
provides: (a) the name and address of the manufacturer, shop or other type of prefabrication 
facility where the fabrication work was performed; and (b) the name, address, and occupational 
classifications of each mechanic, apprentice, laborer or other employee employed in the 
performance of such work, the hours worked by, and wages paid to, each such employee. 
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon its passage.